en: Denaturant
el: Λειαντικα
es: Desnaturalizante
fi: Denaturointiaine
fr: Dénaturant
lt: Denatūrantas
pl: Skażająca
pt: Desnaturante
sk: Denaturačná látka

en: Deodorant
el: Λευκαντικα
es: Desodorante
et: Lahusti
fr: Agent déodorant
lt: Dezodorantas
pl: Dezodorująca
pt: Desodorizante
sk: Dezodoračná látka

en: Depilatory
el: Μαλακτικα
es: Depilatorio
et: Lokkimis- või sirgestusaine
fi: Deodoroiva aine
fr: Agent dépilatoire
hu: Lágyítószer
lt: Depiliantas
pl: Depilująca
pt: Depilatório
sk: Depilačná látka
sl: Depilacijsko sredstvo

en: Detangling
el: Μετουσιωτικα
es: Desenredante
fr: Agent démêlant
hu: Lemosóanyag
lt: Susivėlusių plaukų iššukavimo medžiaga
pl: Ułatwiająca rozczesywanie
pt: Desembaraçador
sk: Látka na zlepšenie rozčesávania vlasov
sl: Sredstvo za lažje razčesavanje

en: Emollient
el: Οξειδωτικα
es: Emoliente
fr: Émollient
lt: Minkštiklis
pl: Zmiękczająca
pt: Emoliente
sk: Zvláčňujúca látka
sl: Mehčalo za kožo

en: Emulsifying
cs: Emulgátor
da: Emulgerende
de: Emulgierend
el: Γαλακτωματοποιητής
es: Emulsificante
et: Emulgaator
fi: Emulgaattori
fr: Agent émulsifiant
hu: Emulgeáló szer
it: Emulsionante
lt: Emulsiklis
lv: Emulgators
nl: Emulgator
pl: Emulgująca
pt: Emulsionante
sk: Emulgátor
sl: Emulgator
sv: Emulgerande

en: Emulsion stabilising
cs: Stabilizátor emulze
de: Emulsionsstabilisierend
el: Σταθεροποιητής γαλακτωμάτων
es: Estabilizador de emulsiones
et: Emulsioonistabilisaator
fi: Emulsiota stabiloiva aine
fr: Stabilisateur d'émulsion
hu: Emulzióstabilizátor
it: Stabilizzante delle emulsioni
lt: Emulsijų stabilizatorius
nl: Emulsiestabilisator
pl: Stabilazująca emulsję
pt: Estabilizador de emulsões
sk: Stabilizátor emulzie
sl: Stabilizator emulzij

en: Film forming
cs: Filmotvorná přísada
da: Filmdannelse
de: Filmbildend
el: Σχηματισμός υμενίων
es: Formadores de película
et: Kelmetekiti
fi: Kalvonmuodostaja
fr: Agent filmogène
hu: Filmképző anyag
it: Filmogeno
lt: Plėvėdaris
lv: Pārklājumu veidojoša viela
nl: Filmvormer
pl: Błonotwórcza
pt: Agente filmogénico
sk: Filmotvorná látka
sl: Filmogeno sredstvo
sv: Filmbildande

en: Foam boosting
cs: Pěnící přísada
el: Συγκρατούν και διατηρούν την υγρασία.
es: Acrecentador de espuma
et: Hoiab ja säilitab niiskust.
fi: Hapettava aine
fr: Synergiste de mousse
hu: Oxidálószer
lt: Putojimo skatinimo medžiaga
lv: Krāso matus.
pl: Zwiększająca pienienie
pt: Estabilizador de espuma
sk: Látka na zlepšenie tvorby peny
sl: Pospeševalec penjenja

en: Foaming
el: Παραγοντεσ δημιουργιασ χηλικων ενωσεων
es: Espumante
et: Nahka silendav aine
fi: Hankaava aine
fr: Agent moussant
hu: Opálosítóanyag
lt: Putodaris
lv: Padara matus viegli ķemmējamus, lokanus, mīkstus un mirdzošus un/vai piešķir tiem lielāku apjomu, vieglumu, mirdzumu u. c.
pl: Pieniąca
pt: Agente de espuma
sk: Penidlo
sl: Penilo

en: Gel forming
cs: Gelotvorná přísada
da: Geldannende
de: Gelbildend
el: Δημιουργία γέλης
es: Gelificante
et: Geelimoodusti
fi: Geelinmuodostaja
fr: Agent de gélification
hu: Gélképző anyag
it: Gelificante
lt: Gelifikantas
lv: Gēlu veidojoša viela
nl: Gelvormer
pl: Żelująca
pt: Gelificante
sk: Gélotvorná látka
sl: Sredstvo za tvorjenje gela
sv: Gelbildande

en: Hair conditioning
cs: Vlasový kondicionér
da: Hårbalsam
de: Haarkonditionierend
el: Περιποίηση μαλλιών
es: Acondicionador capilar
et: Juuksepalsam
fi: Hiuksia hoitava aine
fr: Conditionneur capillaire
it: Condizionante per capelli
lt: Plaukų balzamas
lv: Matus kondicionējoša viela
nl: Hairconditioner
pl: Odżywiająca włosy
pt: Amaciador
sk: Látka na zlepšenie kondície vlasov
sl: Regenerator za lase
sv: Hårkonditionerande

en: Hair dyeing
el: Παραγοντεσ μειωσησ πυκνοτητασ
es: Tintes capilares
et: Pehmendav aine
fr: Colorant capillaire
lt: Plaukų dažai
lv: Kosmētiski iedarbojas uz mutes dobumu, piemēram, tīra, dezodorē, aizsargā.
nl: Haarkleurstof
pl: Koloryzująca włosy
pt: Corante capilar
sk: Farba na vlasy
sl: Barva za lase

en: Hair fixing
el: Παραγοντεσ περιποιησησ δερματοσ
es: Fijadores capilares
et: Pindaktiivne aine
fr: Fixateur capillaire
lt: Plaukų fiksatorius
nl: Haarversteviger
pl: Utrwalająca fryzurę
pt: Agente fixante para o cabelo
sk: Látka na fixáciu vlasov
sl: Utrjevalec za lase

en: Hair waving or straightening
cs: Přísada k vlnění a vyrovnávání vlasů
da: Hårpermanent eller ‐udglatning
el: Παράγοντας βοστρύχωσης (κατσαρώματος) και ισιώματος
es: Ondulador o alisador del cabello
fi: Hiuksia kihartava tai suoristava aine
fr: Agent de frisage ou defrisage
hu: Hajgöndörítő vagy egyenesítő anyag
it: Ondulante o stirante per capelli
lt: Plaukų garbanojimo ir tiesinimo medžiaga
lv: Matus cirtojoša vai iztaisnojoša viela
pl: Falująca lub prostująca włosy
pt: Agente para ondular ou alisar o cabelo
sk: Látka na trvalú onduláciu alebo narovnávanie vlasov
sl: Sredstvo za kodranje ali ravnanje las
sv: Hårpermanent eller rakpermanent

en: Humectant
el: Βελτιώνουν τα καλλυντικά χαρακτηριστικά των νυχιών.
es: Humectante
lt: Drėkiklis
lv: Opalescenta viela
pl: Utrzymująca wilgoć
pt: Humectante
sk: Humektant
sl: Humektant

en: Hydrotrope
el: Επιτρέπουν το φυσικό έλεγχο του χτενίσματος.
es: Hidrótropo
lt: Hidrotropas
pl: Solubilizująca
pt: Hidrótropo
sk: Hydrotropná látka
sl: Hidrotropno sredstvo

en: Keratolytic
el: Παραγοντεσ σχηματισμου υμενιων
es: Queratolítico
et: Teatavad veeldatud propellendid võivad olla ka lahustid.
fi: Hydrotrooppi
fr: Agent kératolytique
lt: Keratolitikas
lv: Pēc uzklāšanas veido vienlaidu slāni uz ādas, matiem vai nagiem.
nl: Huidbruinende stof
pl: Keratolityczna
pt: Queratolítico
sk: Keratolytická látka
sl: Keratolitik

en: Masking
el: Παραγοντεσ φρεσκαδασ/αναζωογονησησ
es: Enmascarante
et: Aitab hoida nahka puhtana.
fi: Ihoa hoitava aine
fr: Agent masquant
lt: Kvapų ir skonio sugėriklis
nl: Huidverzachter
pl: Maskująca
pt: Corrector de odor/gosto
sk: Látka na prekrytie vône a chuti

en: Moisturising
cs: Zvlhčující přísada
da: Fugtighedsgivende
de: Feuchtigkeitsspendend
el: Ενυδατικό
es: Hidratante
et: Niisutusaine
fi: Kosteuttava aine
fr: Hydratant
hu: Hidratáló anyag
it: Idratante
lt: Dregme palaikanti medziaga
lv: Mitrinoša viela
nl: Vochtinbrengend middel
pl: Nawilżająca
pt: Hidratante
sk: Zvlhčujúca látka
sl: Vlažilno sredstvo
sv: Fuktighetsgivande